test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-naegemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - nägemä: # Verb (81) nägemä 'eng to see/est nägema/fin nähdä' - full paradigm
     nägemä+V+Inf/mA: nägemä
     nägemä+V+Inf: nätäq
     nägemä+V+Act+PrfPrc: nännüq
     nägemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [nätt, nättü]

# Differs from tegemä form in "tii"
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: näe
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [näet, näedeq]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näge
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: näemiq
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [näetiq, näedeq]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nägeväq
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: näe
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [näi, näie, näkse]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [näit, näiet, näiq, näieq, näideq, näiedeq, näkset, näkseq, näksedeq]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [näkkʼ, nägi, näkse]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [näimiq, näiemiq]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [näitiq, näietiq, näideq, näiedeq]
     nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [näiq, näieq, näkseq, näiväq, näieväq, näkseväq]

     nägemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nätä
     nägemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nätäs

     nägemä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: näkev

     nägemä+V+Jus: [näkuq, näkkuq]
